Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2122.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; WEST BROADWAY BUSINESS AND AREA COALITION.new text end new text begin $125,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $125,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to West Broadway Business and Area Coalition to support their Youth Jobs program to provide soft skills, marketing, and advertising training for youth in North Minneapolis. These are onetime appropriations. new text end